Wyoming, session 2025, SF0058.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-15-105(a)(viii) by creating a new
subparagraph (W) and 39-16-105(a)(viii) by creating a new
subparagraph (M) are amended to read:

39-15-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following sales or leases are exempt from the
excise tax imposed by this article:
SF0058

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0264

(viii) For the purpose of exempting sales of
services and tangible personal property as an economic
incentive, the following are exempt:

(W) Sales of firearms and ammunition. As
used in this subparagraph:

(I) "Ammunition" means as defined by
W.S. 6-8-403(a)(i);

(II) "Firearm" means as defined by
W.S. 6-8-403(a)(iii).

39-16-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following purchases or leases are exempt from
the excise tax imposed by this article:

(viii) For the purpose of exempting sales of
services and tangible personal property as an economic
incentive, the following are exempt:

SF0058

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0264
(M) Purchases of firearms and ammunition.
As used in this subparagraph:

(I) "Ammunition" means as defined by
W.S. 6-8-403(a)(i);

(II) "Firearm" means as defined by
W.S. 6-8-403(a)(iii).

Section 2. This act shall apply to sales and
purchases of firearms and ammunition on and after July 1,
2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0058